New Jersey, session 222, A1179.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 12 of P.L.1983, c.324 (C.13:1L-12) is amended to read as follows: 12.  a.  The department shall not charge an admission fee for entrance into a State park or forest by any resident of the State [of] who is: (1)   62 or more years of age [or who is] ; (2)   totally disabled [or who is] ; (3)   a disabled veteran; or (4)   an active member of the New Jersey National Guard who has completed Initial Active Duty Training. The department shall prescribe by regulation the types of evidence that may be used to qualify persons for the benefits of this subsection. b.    In addition to an admission fee for entrance into a State park, the department shall not charge a disabled veteran a fee to access a State park beach by motor vehicle in order to fish thereat, including any fee for a mobile sportfishing vehicle permit. c.     As used in this section [,] : "Disabled veteran" means any resident of the State who has been honorably discharged or released under honorable circumstances from active service in any branch of the Armed Forces of the United States and who has been declared by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs, or its successor, to have a service-connected disability of any degree; and "Initial Active Duty Training" means Basic Military Training, for members of the New Jersey Air National Guard, and Basic Combat Training and Advanced Individual Training, for members of the New Jersey Army National Guard. (cf: P.L.1993, c.304, s.1) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.